Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2132
Waste or trespass; remainderman; reversioner; rights.

The owner of an estate in remainder or reversion, may maintain an action for trespass or waste for injuries done to the inheritance, notwithstanding any intervening estate for life or years.

R.S.1867, Code § 638, p. 506;

R.S.1913, § 8249;

C.S.1922, § 9202;

C.S.1929, § 20-2134;

R.S.1943, § 25-2132.

Lessee remaining in possession after death of life tenant becomes liable to the reversioner for reasonable value of the use and occupation of premises. Guthmann v. Vallery, 51 Neb. 824, 71 N.W. 734 (1897).

Conveyance of reversion carries rents. Eiseley v. Spooner, 23 Neb. 470, 36 N.W. 659 (1888).